src/fst/apertium-sty.lexc
!!! Morphological transducer for Siberian Tatar !!!

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>  ! Noun

%<sg%> ! Singular
%<pl%> ! Plural

! Cases ! Падежи
%<nom%>       ! Nominative         ! Именительный
%<gen%>       ! Genitive           ! Родительный
%<dat%>       ! Dative             ! Дательный
%<acc%>       ! Accusative         ! Винительный
%<loc%>       ! Locative           ! Местно-временнной
%<abl%>       ! Ablative           ! Творительный

! Possessives ! Категория принадлежности
%<poss1sg%>     ! First person singular
%<poss2sg%>     ! Second person singular
%<poss3sg%>     ! Third person singular
%<poss1pl%>     ! First person plural
%<poss2pl%>     ! Second person plural
%<poss3pl%>     ! Third person plural

%{A%}   ! ArchiVowel а or ә
%{E%}   ! ArchiVowel ы or е
%{O%}   ! ArchiVowel о or ө
%{L%}   ! ArchiCnst л or н
%{T%}   ! ArchiCnst т or н
%{K%}	! ArchiCnst (к or ҡ) or (г or ғ)
%{G%}	! ArchiCnst г or ғ
%{I%}	! ArchiCnst (ы or е) or (о or ө)
%{i%}	! ArchiCnst (ы or е) or (о or ө) or 0
%{s%}	! ArchiCnst s or 0


LEXICON Root

NounStems ;

LEXICON CASES-GENERAL

%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{K%}%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>т%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-PLURAL

%<gen%>:%>н%{E%}ң # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н%{E%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>т%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-1SG-2SG-POSSESSIVE

%<nom%>:%> # ;
%<gat%>:%>%{A%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>т%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-1PL-2PL-POSSESSIVE

%<nom%>:%> # ;
%<gat%>:%>к%{A%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>т%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE

%<nom%>:%> # ;
%<gat%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<loc%>:%>нт%{A%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;

LEXICON NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR

%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң # ; !add ҡы/ке/ҡо/кө to the end of a token
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} # ;

LEXICON NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL

%<gen%>:%>н%{E%}ң # ; !add ҡы/кеto the end of a token
%<acc%>:%>н%{E%} # ;

LEXICON NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR

%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң # ; !add ҡы/ке/ҡо/кө to the end of a token

LEXICON NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL

%<gen%>:%>н%{E%}ң # ; !add ҡы/ке to the end of a token

LEXICON POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR

%<poss1sg%>:%>%{i%}м # ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң # ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} # ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{i%}б%{E%}с # ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{i%}%{G%}%{E%}с # ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} # ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR

%<poss1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-AFTER-1SG-2SG-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss1sg%>:%>%{i%}м NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң CASES-AFTER-1SG-2SG-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{i%}б%{E%}с CASES-AFTER-1PL-2PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{i%}б%{E%}с NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{i%}%{G%}%{E%}с CASES-AFTER-1PL-2PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{i%}%{G%}%{E%}с NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;

LEXICON CASES-AFTER-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL

%<poss1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-AFTER-1SG-2SG-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss1sg%>:%>%{i%}м NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң CASES-AFTER-1SG-2SG-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{i%}б%{E%}с CASES-AFTER-1PL-2PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{i%}б%{E%}с NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{i%}%{G%}%{E%}с CASES-AFTER-1PL-2PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{i%}%{G%}%{E%}с NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-1-2-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{s%}%{I%} NUM-SENSITIVE-CASES-AFTER-3SG-3PL-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;


LEXICON POSSESSIVE-PLURAL

%<poss1sg%>:%>%{E%}м # ;
%<poss2sg%>:%>%{E%}ң # ;
%<poss3sg%>:%>%{E%} # ;
%<poss1pl%>:%>%{E%}б%{E%}с # ;
%<poss2pl%>:%>%{E%}%{G%}%{E%}с # ;
%<poss3pl%>:%>%{E%} # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р # ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-AFTER-PLURAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-AFTER-POSSESSIVE-PLURAL ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>: CASES-GENERAL ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<n%>: CASES-AFTER-POSSESSIVE-SINGULAR ;
%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON NounStems

ҡысҡартма:ҡысҡартма N1 ; ! ""
!абзац:абзац N1 ; ! ""
өрөк:өрөк N1 ; ! ""
!абсурд:абсурд N1 ; ! "абсурд"
!авангард:авангард N1 ; ! "авангард"
!аванс:аванс N1 ; ! "аванс"
ҡул:ҡул N1 ; ! "рука"
күл:күл N1 ; ! "озеро"
тос:тос N1 ; ! "соль"
сөт:сөт N1 ; ! "молоко"
тора:тора N1 ; ! "город"
кесә:кесә N1 ; ! "карман"
соло:соло N1 ; ! "овёс"
төлгө:төлгө N1 ; ! "лиса"
көн:көн N1 ; ! "день"
шәм:шәм N1 ; ! "свеча"
таң:таң N1 ; ! "заря"
төн:төн N1 ; ! "ночь"
ҡош:ҡош N1 ; ! "птица"
